Georgia, session 2025_26, HB8.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
9 SECTION 1.
10 Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
11 is amended by revising Code Section 48-7-40.30, relating to tax credits for certain qualified
12 investments for limited period of time, as follows:
13 "48-7-40.30.
14 (a) The General Assembly finds that entrepreneurial businesses significantly contribute
15 to the economy of this state. The intent of this Code section is to achieve the following:
H. B. 8
- 1 -

25 LC 50 0946
16 (1) To encourage individual investors to invest in early stage, innovative, wealth-creating
17 businesses;
18 (2) To enlarge the number of high quality, high paying high-paying jobs within this state
19 both to attract qualified individuals to move to and work within this state and to retain
20 young people educated in Georgia's universities and colleges;
21 (3) To expand the economy of Georgia by enlarging its base of wealth-creating
22 businesses; and
23 (4) To support high-growth business and other businesses seeking to commercialize
24 technology invented in Georgia's universities and colleges.
25 (b) As used in this Code section, the term:
26 (1) 'Allowable credit' means the credit as it may be reduced pursuant to paragraph (3) of
27 subsection (i) of this Code section.
28 (2) 'Headquarters' means the principal central administrative office of a business located
29 in this state which conducts significant operations of such business.
30 (3) 'Investor' means:
31 (A) A person who is a resident of this state or a nonresident who is obligated to pay
32 taxes imposed by this chapter; or
33 (B) A pass-through entity which is formed for investment purposes, has no business
34 operations, has committed capital under management of equal to or less than $5 million,
35 and is not capitalized with funds raised or pooled through private placement
36 memoranda directed to institutional investors. A venture capital fund or commodity
37 fund with institutional investors or a hedge fund shall not qualify as an investor.
38 (3)(4) 'Net income tax liability' means income tax liability reduced by all other credits
39 allowed under this chapter.
40 (4)(5) 'Pass-through entity' means a partnership, an S-corporation, or a limited liability
41 company taxed as a partnership.
H. B. 8
- 2 -

25 LC 50 0946
42 (5)(6) 'Professional services' means those services of a profession specified in
43 paragraph (2) of Code Section 14-7-2 or any service which requires as a condition
44 precedent to the rendering of such service the obtaining of a license from a state licensing
45 board pursuant to Title 43.
46 (6)(7) 'Qualified business' means a registered business that:
47 (A) Is either a corporation, limited liability company, or a general or limited
48 partnership located in this state;
49 (B) Was organized no more than three years before the qualified investment was made;
50 (C) Has its headquarters located in this state at the time the investment was made and
51 has maintained such headquarters for the entire time the qualified business benefited
52 from the tax credit provided for pursuant to this Code section;
53 (D) Employs 20 or fewer people in this state at the time it is registered as a qualified
54 business;
55 (E) Has had in any complete fiscal year before registration gross annual revenue as
56 determined in accordance with the Internal Revenue Code of $500,000.00 or less on a
57 consolidated basis;
58 (F) Has not obtained during its existence more than $1 million in aggregate gross cash
59 proceeds from the issuance of its equity or debt investments, not including commercial
60 loans from chartered banking or savings and loan institutions;
61 (G) Has not utilized the tax credit described in Code Section 48-7-40.26;
62 (H) Is primarily engaged in manufacturing, processing, online and digital warehousing,
63 online and digital wholesaling, software development, information technology services,
64 or research and development or is a high-growth business providing services other than
65 those described in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph; and
66 (I) Does not engage substantially in:
67 (i) Retail sales;
68 (ii) Real estate or construction;
H. B. 8
- 3 -

25 LC 50 0946
69 (iii) Professional services;
70 (iv) Gambling;
71 (v) Natural resource extraction;
72 (vi) Financial, brokerage, or investment activities or insurance; or
73 (vii) Entertainment, amusement, recreation, or athletic or fitness activity for which
74 an admission or membership is charged.
75 A business shall be substantially engaged in one of the above activities listed in
76 subparagraph (H) or (I) of this paragraph if its gross revenue from such activity exceeds
77 25 percent of its gross revenues in any fiscal year or it is established pursuant to its
78 articles of incorporation, articles of organization, operating agreement, or similar
79 organizational documents to engage in such activity as one of its primary purposes.
80 (7)(8) 'Qualified investment' means an investment by a qualified an investor of cash in
81 a qualified business for common or preferred stock or an equity interest or a purchase for
82 cash of qualified subordinated debt in a qualified business; provided, however, that funds
83 constituting a qualified investment cannot have been raised or be raised as a result of
84 other tax incentive programs. Furthermore, no investment of common or preferred stock
85 or an equity interest or purchase of subordinated debt shall qualify as a qualified
86 investment if a broker fee or commission or a similar remuneration is paid or given
87 directly or indirectly for soliciting such investment or purchase. Investment of common
88 or preferred stock or an equity interest or a purchase of qualified subordinated debt that
89 contains or involves a broker fee or commission or a similar remuneration paid or given,
90 directly or indirectly, for soliciting such investment or purchase shall qualify as a
91 qualified investment. However, the investor shall be allowed the tax credit under this
92 Code section only on the amount of the direct investment in the qualified investment and
93 not on the broker fees or commissions or similar remunerations paid or given, directly or
94 indirectly, for soliciting such investment or purchase.
H. B. 8
- 4 -

25 LC 50 0946
95 (8) 'Qualified investor' means an accredited investor as that term is defined by the United
96 States Securities and Exchange Commission who is:
97 (A) An individual person who is a resident of this state or a nonresident who is
98 obligated to pay taxes imposed by this chapter; or
99 (B) A pass-through entity which is formed for investment purposes, has no business
100 operations, has committed capital under management of equal to or less than $5 million,
101 and is not capitalized with funds raised or pooled through private placement
102 memoranda directed to institutional investors. A venture capital fund or commodity
103 fund with institutional investors or a hedge fund shall not qualify as a qualified investor.
104 (9) 'Qualified subordinated debt' means indebtedness that is not secured, that may or may
105 not be convertible into common or preferred stock or other equity interest, and that is
106 subordinated in payment to all other indebtedness of the qualified business issued or to
107 be issued for money borrowed and no part of which has a maturity date less than five
108 years after the date such indebtedness was purchased.
109 (10) 'Registered' or 'registration' means that a business has been certified by the
110 commissioner as a qualified business at the time of application to the commissioner.
111 (c) A qualified business shall register with the commissioner for purposes of this Code
112 section. Approval of such registration shall constitute certification by the commissioner
113 for 12 months after being issued. A business shall be permitted to renew its registration
114 with the commissioner so long as, at the time of renewal, the business remains a qualified
115 business.
116 (d) Any individual person making a qualified investment directly in a qualified business
117 in the 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, or 2018 calendar year shall be allowed
118 a tax credit of 35 percent of the amount invested against the tax imposed by this chapter
119 commencing on January 1 of the second for the taxable year following the year in which
120 the qualified investment was made as provided in this Code section.
H. B. 8
- 5 -

25 LC 50 0946
121 (e) Any pass-through entity making a qualified investment directly in a qualified business
122 in the 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, or 2018 calendar year shall be allowed
123 a tax credit of 35 percent of the amount invested against the tax imposed by this chapter
124 commencing on January 1 of the second for the taxable year following the year in which
125 the qualified investment was made as provided in this Code section. Each individual who
126 is a shareholder, partner, or member of an entity shall be allocated the credit allowed the
127 pass-through entity in an amount determined in the same manner as the proportionate
128 shares of income or loss of such pass-through entity would be determined. If an
129 individual's share of the pass-through entity's credit is limited due to the maximum
130 allowable credit under this Code section for a taxable year, the pass-through entity and its
131 owners may not reallocate the unused credit among the other owners.
132 (f) Tax credits claimed pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to the following
133 conditions and limitations:
134 (1) The qualified investor shall not be eligible for the credit for the taxable year in which
135 the qualified investment is made but shall be eligible for the credit for the second taxable
136 year beginning after the qualified investment is made as provided in subsection (d) or (e)
137 of this Code section;
138 (2) The aggregate amount of credit allowed an individual for one or more qualified
139 investments in a single taxable year under this Code section, whether made directly or by
140 a pass-through entity and allocated to such individual, shall not exceed $50,000.00;
141 (3)(2) In no event shall the amount of the tax credit allowed an individual under this
142 Code section for a taxable year exceed such individual's net income tax liability. Any
143 unused credit amount shall be allowed to be carried forward for three years from the close
144 of the taxable year in which the qualified investment was made. No such credit shall be
145 allowed against prior years' tax liability;
H. B. 8
- 6 -

25 LC 50 0946
146 (4)(3) The qualified investor's basis in the common or preferred stock, equity interest,
147 or qualified subordinated debt acquired as a result of the qualified investment shall be
148 reduced for purposes of this chapter by the amount of the allowable credit; and
149 (5) The credit shall not be transferrable transferable by the qualified investor except to
150 the heirs and legatees of the qualified investor upon his or her death and to his or her
151 spouse or incident to divorce.
152 (4) Any tax credit earned and previously claimed but not used against its income tax may
153 be transferred or sold, in whole or in part, by the investor to another Georgia taxpayer.
154 (g) The registration of a business as a qualified business shall be subject to the following
155 conditions and limitations:
156 (1) If the commissioner finds that any of the information contained in an application of
157 a business for registration under this Code section is false, the commissioner shall revoke
158 the registration of such business. The commissioner shall not revoke the registration of
159 a business solely because it ceases business operations for an indefinite period of time,
160 as so long as the business renews its registration;
161 (2) A registration as a qualified business may not be sold or otherwise transferred, except
162 that, if a qualified business enters into a merger, conversion, consolidation, or other
163 similar transaction with another business and the surviving company would otherwise
164 meet the criteria for being a qualified business, the surviving company retains the
165 registration for the 12 month registration period without further application to the
166 commissioner. In such a case, the qualified business must shall provide the
167 commissioner with written notice of the merger, conversion, consolidation, or similar
168 transaction and such other information as required by the commissioner; and
169 (3) The commissioner shall report to the House Committee on Ways and Means and the
170 Senate Finance Committee each year all of the businesses that have registered with the
171 commissioner as a qualified business. The Such report shall include the name and
172 address of each business, the location of its headquarters, a description of the types of
H. B. 8
- 7 -

25 LC 50 0946
173 business in which it engages, the number of jobs created by the business during the period
174 covered by the report, and the average wages paid by these such jobs.
175 (h) Any credit claimed under this Code section shall be recaptured in the following
176 situations and shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:
177 (1) If within two years after the qualified investment was made, the qualified investor
178 transfers any of the securities or qualified subordinated debt received in the qualified
179 investment to another person or entity, other than a transfer resulting from one of the
180 following:
181 (A) The death of the qualified investor;
182 (B) A transfer to the spouse of the qualified investor or incident to divorce; or
183 (C) A merger, conversion, consolidation, sale of the qualified business's assets, or
184 similar transaction requiring approval by the owners of the qualified business under
185 applicable law, to the extent the qualified investor does not receive cash or tangible
186 property in such merger, conversion, consolidation, sale, or other similar transaction;
187 (2) Except as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection, if within five years after the
188 qualified investment was made, the qualified business makes a redemption with respect
189 to the securities received or pays any principal of the qualified subordinated debt;
190 (3) If within two years after the qualified investment was made, the qualified investor
191 participates in the operation of the qualified business. For the purpose purposes of this
192 paragraph, a qualified an investor participates in the operation of a qualified business if
193 the qualified investor, or the qualified investor's spouse, parent, sibling, or child, or a
194 business controlled by any of these individuals, provides services of any nature to the
195 qualified business for compensation, whether as an employee, a contractor, or otherwise.
196 However, a person who provides uncompensated professional advice to a qualified
197 business, whether as an officer, a member of the board of directors or managers or
198 otherwise, or participates in a stock or membership option or stock or membership plan,
199 or both, shall be eligible for the credit;
H. B. 8
- 8 -

25 LC 50 0946
200 (4) The amount of the credit recaptured shall apply only to the qualified investment in
201 the particular qualified business in which the investment was made;
202 (5) The amount of the recaptured tax credit determined under this subsection shall be
203 added to the qualified investor's income tax liability for the taxable year in which the
204 recapture occurs under this subsection; and
205 (6) In the event the credit is recaptured because the qualified business ceases business
206 operations, dissolves, or liquidates, the qualified investor may claim either the credit
207 authorized under this Code section or any capital loss the qualified investor otherwise
208 would be able to claim regarding that qualified business, but shall not be authorized to
209 claim and be allowed both.
210 (i)(1) A qualified An investor seeking to claim a tax credit provided for under this Code
211 section shall submit an application to the commissioner for tentative approval of such tax
212 credit between September 1 and October 31 of the year for which the tax credit is claimed
213 or allowed. The commissioner shall promulgate the rules and forms on which the
214 application is to be submitted. Amounts specified on such application shall not be
215 changed by the qualified investor after the application is approved by the commissioner.
216 The commissioner shall review such application and shall tentatively approve such
217 application upon determining that it meets the requirements of this Code section.
218 (2) The commissioner shall provide tentative approval of the applications by the date
219 provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection as follows:
220 (A) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
221 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2011 calendar year and claimed and
222 allowed in the 2013 taxable year shall not exceed $10 million in such year;
223 (B) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
224 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2012 calendar year and claimed and
225 allowed in the 2014 taxable year shall not exceed $10 million in such year;
H. B. 8
- 9 -

25 LC 50 0946
226 (C) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
227 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2013 calendar year and claimed and
228 allowed in the 2015 taxable year shall not exceed $10 million in such year;
229 (D) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
230 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2014 calendar year and claimed and
231 allowed in the 2016 taxable year shall not exceed $5 million in such year;
232 (E) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
233 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2015 calendar year and claimed and
234 allowed in the 2017 taxable year shall not exceed $5 million in such year;
235 (F) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
236 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2016 calendar year and claimed and
237 allowed in the 2018 taxable year shall not exceed $5 million in such year;
238 (G) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
239 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2017 calendar year and claimed and
240 allowed in the 2019 taxable year shall not exceed $5 million in such year; and
241 (H) The total aggregate amount of all tax credits allowed to qualified investors or
242 pass-through entities for investments made in the 2018 calendar year and claimed and
243 allowed in the 2020 taxable year shall not exceed $5 million in such year.
244 The aggregate amount of tax credits allowed pursuant to this Code section shall not
245 exceed $5 million in a calendar year.
246 (3) The commissioner shall notify each qualified investor of the tax credits tentatively
247 approved and allocated to such qualified investor by December 31 of the year in which
248 the application was submitted. In the event that the credit amounts on the tax credit
249 applications filed with the commissioner exceed the maximum aggregate limit of tax
250 credits under this subsection, then the tax credits shall be allocated among the qualified
251 investors who filed a timely application on a pro rata basis based upon the amounts
252 otherwise allowed by this Code section. Once the tax credit application has been
H. B. 8
- 10 -

25 LC 50 0946
253 approved and the amount approved has been communicated to the applicant, the qualified
254 investor may then apply the amount of the approved tax credit to its tax liability for the
255 tax year for which the approved application applies.
256 (j) The commissioner shall report annually to the House Committee on Ways and Means
257 and the Senate Finance Committee on the percentage of tax credits for the previous taxable
258 year utilized under this Code section.
259 (k) The commissioner shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement
260 and administer this Code section.
261 (l) This Code section shall stand repealed and reserved on December 31, 2031."
262 SECTION 2.
263 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to taxable years
264 beginning on or after such date.
265 SECTION 3.
266 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 8
- 11 -